Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202690-203
Conveyance to Northeast Community College Area; donation of land.

(1) For purposes of this section, qualified property means the 43.55 acres that were deemed to be not needed for state purposes pursuant to section 90-202 and were deemed to be excess land by the Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee prior to July 1, 2026.

(2) Notwithstanding sections 72-811 to 72-818 or any other provision of law, the Director of Administrative Services shall, within thirty days after April 28, 2017, submit a request to the Legislature and the Governor asking for authorization to convey the qualified property to the Northeast Community College Area as a donation so that the qualified property may be used for the purpose of development of the Northeast Community College Technology Park.

(3) Approval of the Governor and the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council shall be required to donate the qualified property to the Northeast Community College Area.

(4) If the Northeast Community College Area sells the qualified property within ten years after it is donated pursuant to this section, all proceeds of the sale shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 2017, LB376, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 66.
July 1, 2026